Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3807
(UTC 107) Governing law.

(UTC 107) (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the meaning and effect of the terms of a trust are determined by:

(1) the law of the jurisdiction designated in the terms unless the designation of that jurisdiction's law is contrary to a strong public policy of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue; or

(2) in the absence of a controlling designation in the terms of the trust, the law of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue.

(b) The meaning and effect of the terms of a trust that pertain to title to Nebraska real estate are determined by the law of Nebraska.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 7.